Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3,116
Study; cooperation with
Department of Labor and other state agencies; contracts authorized; reports;
department; duty.

(1) The Department of Revenue and the Department
of Labor shall cooperate and participate in the collection of data for the
study described in section 77-3,115. Other state agencies, including the University
of Nebraska, shall assist in the study or the update as requested by the Department
of Revenue and as any necessary funds are available. Any agency may contract
with the Department of Revenue to provide such assistance. The Department
of Revenue may also contract with an independent entity for the entity to
conduct or assist in conducting such study or update. The department, other
state agency, or independent entity preparing the material or study shall
utilize and consider, along with other information, the results of any available
study relating to the items listed in section 77-3,115 and conducted or contracted
for by the Legislature in the year prior to April 16, 1992.

(2) A preliminary report of the initial study's models and initial findings
shall be reported by the Department of Revenue to the chairpersons of the
Appropriations Committee and Revenue Committee of the Legislature, the Clerk
of the Legislature, and the Governor by December 1, 1992. The initial study
shall be completed and the department shall report its findings to the same
entities by December 1, 1993. The study shall be updated and the update shall
be reported to the same entities on November 1, 2013, and every
two years thereafter. The study submitted to the Appropriations Committee
and Revenue Committee of the Legislature and the Clerk of the Legislature
pursuant to this subsection shall be submitted electronically.

(3) Any models developed for the initial study or update shall be electronically
shared with the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The Department of Revenue shall
include in its budget request for every other biennium following the 1991-93
biennium sufficient appropriation authority to conduct or contract for the
required update.

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 218;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 29;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 137;

Laws 2013, LB612, § 2.